Nevada, session 83, SB361.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 179 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto the provisions set forth as sections 2 to 19, inclusive, of this
act.
Sec. 2. As used in sections 2 to 19, inclusive, of this act,
unless the context otherwise requires, the words and terms defined
in sections 3 to 13, inclusive, of this act have the meanings
ascribed to them in those sections.
Sec. 3. “Electronic communication service” means a service
that provides to users of the service the ability to send or receive
radio frequency, wire or electronic communications.
Sec. 4. “Electronic communication service provider” means
a person who operates an electronic communication service.
Sec. 5. “Electronic device” means a device that enables
access to or use of an electronic communication service, remote
computing service or location information service.
Sec. 6. “Governmental entity” means a state or local
governmental agency, including, without limitation, a law
-
*SB361*

– 3 –
enforcement agency or other investigative entity, agency,
department, division, bureau, board or commission or person
acting or purporting to act for or on behalf of a state or local
governmental agency.
Sec. 7. “Location information” means information
concerning the location of an electronic device or unique
identifier that, in whole or in part, is generated or derived from or
obtained by the operation of an electronic device or unique
identifier.
Sec. 8. “Location information service” means the provision
of global positioning service or other mapping, locational or
directional information service.
Sec. 9. “Location information service provider” means a
person who operates a location information service.
Sec. 10. “Remote computing service” means the provision to
the public of computer storage or processing services by means of
an electronic communication system.
Sec. 11. “Remote computing service provider” means a
person who operates a remote computing service.
Sec. 12. “Tracking warrant” means a warrant that grants a
peace officer access to location information of an electronic device
or a unique identifier.
Sec. 13. “Unique identifier” means any numeric or
alphanumeric string that is associated with a single entity or
account within a given electronic communication service.
Sec. 14. 1. Except as provided in subsection 2, a
governmental entity shall not obtain the location information of
an electronic device or unique identifier without a tracking
warrant.
2. A governmental entity may obtain location information of
an electronic device or unique identifier without a tracking
warrant in the following circumstances:
(a) If the electronic device is reported lost or stolen by the
owner or user.
(b) To respond to a call or request for emergency services by
the owner or user pursuant to NRS 707.630.
(c) If the owner or user of the electronic device or the user of a
unique identifier gives the governmental entity informed, written
consent.
(d) With the informed, written consent of the legal guardian or
next of kin:
(1) If the owner or user of an electronic device or user of a
unique identifier is believed to be deceased or reported missing
and unable to be contacted; or
-
*SB361*

– 4 –
(2) If the owner or user of an electronic device or user of a
unique identifier is a child who is less than 18 years of age.
(e) If a peace officer has probable cause to believe that:
(1) There is an emergency situation that poses an
immediate threat of death or serious injury to the owner or user of
the electronic device or the user of the unique identifier;
(2) The location information is necessary to prevent or
avoid the immediate threat to the owner or user of the electronic
device or the user of the unique identifier; and
(3) Exigent circumstances make obtaining a warrant
impractical.
3. A peace officer who obtains location information without a
tracking warrant in the manner described in paragraph (d) of
subsection 2 shall, not later than 48 hours after obtaining the
location information, apply for a tracking warrant that meets the
requirements under section 15 of this act. If the application is
denied, any location information, or evidence derived therefrom, is
inadmissible in any trial, hearing or other proceeding before any
court, department, officer, agency or other authority of this State,
or political subdivision thereof, except to prove a violation of this
section.
4. Any location information obtained in violation of the
provisions of this section, or evidence derived therefrom, is
inadmissible in any trial, hearing or other proceeding before any
court, department, officer, agency or other authority of this State,
or political subdivision thereof, except to prove a violation of this
section.
5. As used in this section, “owner” includes the lessee of an
electronic device. The term does not include an electronic
communication service provider, location information service
provider, remote computing service provider or other commercial
or business entity that is the lessor of an electronic device during
the term of the lease.
Sec. 15. 1. An application for a tracking warrant, or
extension thereof, may only be granted:
(a) On affidavit or affidavits sworn to before a magistrate that
establish the grounds for issuing a tracking warrant; and
(b) If the magistrate finds the application is complete and
supported by probable cause to believe that:
(1) The person who owns or is using an electronic device or
who is using a unique identifier is committing, has committed or is
about to commit an offense; and
(2) The location information of the electronic device or
unique identifier will produce evidence of the offense described in
subparagraph (1).
-
*SB361*

– 5 –
2. Each application for a tracking warrant, or extension
thereof, must be made in writing upon oath or affirmation and
must include:
(a) The identity of the peace officer making the application,
and the magistrate authorizing the application;
(b) A full and complete statement of the facts and
circumstances relied upon by the peace officer to justify his or her
belief that a tracking warrant should be issued by the magistrate,
including, without limitation:
(1) Details as to the particular offense that has been, is
being or is about to be committed;
(2) The identity of the person, if known, committing the
offense whose location information is to be obtained;
(3) A particular description of the nature of the electronic
device or unique identifier for which location information is to be
obtained;
(4) A statement of the period for which the location
information is sought to be collected; and
(5) A statement of the objective that collecting location
information will achieve.
(c) If the application is for the extension of the period specified
in the original tracking warrant, a statement setting forth:
(1) The results thus far obtained from the collection of
location information or a reasonable explanation of the failure to
obtain such results;
(2) How the granting of the extension will aid in achieving
the objective stated in the original application;
(3) The identity, if learned or known, of the owner and the
user of the electronic device or the user of the unique identifier;
and
(4) If location information was obtained, the identity of the
electronic communication service provider, location information
service provider or remote computing service provider from which
the location information was obtained.
3. The magistrate may require the peace officer making the
application to furnish additional testimony or documentary
evidence under oath or affirmation in support of the application.
Oral testimony must be reduced to writing.
4. The magistrate may accept a facsimile or electronic copy of
the signature of any person required to give an oath or
affirmation, as part of an application submitted pursuant to this
section, as an original signature to the application.
5. Applications made for and tracking warrants and any
extensions thereof issued under this section must be sealed by the
magistrate and must not be disclosed except in the following cases:
-
*SB361*

– 6 –
(a) Upon a showing of good cause before a court of competent
jurisdiction.
(b) To the extent necessary to execute the tracking warrant.
(c) To comply with section 17 or 19 of this act.
Sec. 16. 1. Each tracking warrant, or extension thereof,
issued pursuant to section 15 of this act must:
(a) Specify the identity of the peace officer authorized to
collect the location information of the electronic device or unique
identifier, and the magistrate authorizing the application;
(b) State the grounds or probable cause for its issuance and
the name of any person whose affidavit has been taken in support
thereof or incorporate by reference the affidavit or statement upon
which it is based;
(c) Identify the electronic device or unique identifier for which
the peace officer identified in paragraph (a) is authorized to
collect location information;
(d) Specify the period for which the location information is
authorized to be collected, including a statement as to whether or
not the authorization will automatically terminate when the
objective described in the application is achieved;
(e) State the identity of the person, if known, whose location
information is to be obtained;
(f) Designate the magistrate to whom the tracking warrant is to
be returned;
(g) Direct that the tracking warrant be returned with an
inventory of the location information collected not later than 10
days after the date of expiration of the period specified in the
tracking warrant or any extension thereof, whichever is later; and
(h) Contain a provision stating that the authorization to access
and collect location data for the period specified in the tracking
warrant and any extension thereof will terminate upon
achievement of the objective stated in the original application, or
in any event in not later than 30 days after issuance.
2. A tracking warrant must, upon request of the applicant,
direct an electronic communication service provider, location
information service provider or remote computing service provider
to furnish the peace officer forthwith all information and
technical assistance necessary to accomplish the collection of
location information unobtrusively and with a minimum of
interference with services. Any electronic communication service
provider, location information service provider or remote
computing service provider or other person furnishing such
information or technical assistance must be compensated by the
applicant at the prevailing rates.
-
*SB361*

– 7 –
3. Whenever a tracking warrant is issued, the tracking
warrant may require the applicant to make reports to the
magistrate who issued the tracking warrant showing what
progress has been made toward achievement of the objective stated
in the original application and the need for continued collection.
Such reports must be made at such intervals as the magistrate may
require.
4. A tracking warrant must not authorize access and
collection of location information for any period longer than is
necessary to achieve the objective given in the application for the
tracking warrant, and except as otherwise provided in subsection
5, in no event more than 30 days.
5. Extensions of the period specified in a tracking warrant
may be granted only upon application for an extension made in
the manner prescribed in section 15 of this act. The period of
extension must not be longer than the magistrate who issues the
extension deems necessary to achieve the objective for which it
was granted and in no event for more than 30 days.
Sec. 17. Any location information obtained pursuant to a
tracking warrant or evidence derived therefrom must not be
received in evidence or otherwise disclosed in any trial, hearing or
other proceeding unless each party, not less than 10 days before
the date on which the trial, hearing or other proceeding is
scheduled to begin, has been furnished with the tracking warrant,
the accompanying application, any location information collected
pursuant to the tracking warrant and any evidence derived
therefrom. The court may waive this requirement if the court finds
that:
1. It was not practicable to furnish a party with the required
information 10 days before the date on which the trial, hearing or
other proceeding is scheduled to begin; and
2. Any party will not be prejudiced by such a waiver.
Sec. 18. 1. Any aggrieved person in any trial, hearing or
proceeding in or before any court, department, officer, agency or
other authority of this State, or a political subdivision thereof, may
move to suppress the contents of any collected location
information, or evidence derived therefrom, on the grounds that:
(a) The location information was obtained in violation of
section 14 of this act or was otherwise unlawfully obtained;
(b) The tracking warrant is insufficient on its face;
(c) There was not probable cause for believing the existence of
the grounds on which the tracking warrant was issued;
(d) The collection was not made in conformity with the
authorization given by the tracking warrant or was otherwise
unlawfully executed; or
-
*SB361*

– 8 –
(e) The period specified in the order or any extension had
expired.
2. A judge shall receive evidence on any issue of fact
necessary to the decision of a motion filed pursuant to this section.
3. A motion made pursuant to this section must be made
before the trial, hearing or proceeding unless there was no
opportunity to make such a motion or the person was not aware of
the grounds of the motion. If the motion is granted, the collected
location information, or evidence derived therefrom, must be
treated in accordance with section 17 of this act as having been
obtained in violation of section 14 of this act.
Sec. 19. 1. Within a reasonable time but not later than 90
days after the date of expiration of the period specified in a
tracking warrant or any extension thereof, whichever is later, the
magistrate who issued the tracking warrant shall cause to be
served on the person identified in the tracking warrant or any
extension thereof, notice of:
(a) The fact of the issuance of the tracking warrant or
application;
(b) The period requested or authorized for the collection of
location information; and
(c) The fact that during the period location information was or
was not collected.
2. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 239.0115, the notice
given pursuant to this section is confidential and must not be
released for inspection unless subpoenaed by a court of competent
jurisdiction.
Sec. 20. NRS 239.010 is hereby amended to read as follows:
239.010 1. Except as otherwise provided in this section and
NRS 1.4683, 1.4687, 1A.110, 3.2203, 41.0397, 41.071, 49.095,
49.293, 62D.420, 62D.440, 62E.516, 62E.620, 62H.025, 62H.030,
62H.170, 62H.220, 62H.320, 75A.100, 75A.150, 76.160, 78.152,
80.113, 81.850, 82.183, 86.246, 86.54615, 87.515, 87.5413,
87A.200, 87A.580, 87A.640, 88.3355, 88.5927, 88.6067, 88A.345,
88A.7345, 89.045, 89.251, 90.730, 91.160, 116.757, 116A.270,
116B.880, 118B.026, 119.260, 119.265, 119.267, 119.280,
119A.280, 119A.653, 119A.677, 119B.370, 119B.382, 120A.640,
120A.690, 125.130, 125B.140, 126.141, 126.161, 126.163, 126.730,
127.007, 127.057, 127.130, 127.140, 127.2817, 128.090, 130.312,
130.712, 136.050, 159.044, 159A.044, 164.041, 172.075, 172.245,
176.01334, 176.01385, 176.015, 176.0625, 176.09129, 176.156,
176A.630, 178.39801, 178.4715, 178.5691, 178.5717, 179.495,
179A.070, 179A.165, 179D.160, 180.600, 200.3771, 200.3772,
200.5095, 200.604, 202.3662, 205.4651, 209.392, 209.3923,
209.3925, 209.419, 209.429, 209.521, 211A.140, 213.010, 213.040,
-
*SB361*

– 9 –
213.095, 213.131, 217.105, 217.110, 217.464, 217.475, 218A.350,
218E.625, 218F.150, 218G.130, 218G.240, 218G.350, 218G.615,
224.240, 226.462, 226.796, 228.270, 228.450, 228.495, 228.570,
231.069, 231.1285, 231.1473, 232.1369, 233.190, 237.300,
239.0105, 239.0113, 239.014, 239B.026, 239B.030, 239B.040,
239B.050, 239C.140, 239C.210, 239C.230, 239C.250, 239C.270,
239C.420, 240.007, 241.020, 241.030, 241.039, 242.105, 244.264,
244.335, 247.540, 247.545, 247.550, 247.560, 250.087, 250.130,
250.140, 250.145, 250.150, 268.095, 268.0978, 268.490, 268.910,
269.174, 271A.105, 281.195, 281.805, 281A.350, 281A.680,
281A.685, 281A.750, 281A.755, 281A.780, 284.4068, 284.4086,
286.110, 286.118, 287.0438, 289.025, 289.080, 289.387, 289.830,
293.4855, 293.5002, 293.503, 293.504, 293.558, 293.5757, 293.870,
293.906, 293.908, 293.909, 293.910, 293B.135, 293D.510, 331.110,
332.061, 332.351, 333.333, 333.335, 338.070, 338.1379, 338.1593,
338.1725, 338.1727, 348.420, 349.597, 349.775, 353.205,
353A.049, 353A.085, 353A.100, 353C.240, 353D.250, 360.240,
360.247, 360.255, 360.755, 361.044, 361.2242, 361.610, 365.138,
366.160, 368A.180, 370.257, 370.327, 372A.080, 378.290, 378.300,
379.0075, 379.008, 379.1495, 385A.830, 385B.100, 387.626,
387.631, 388.1455, 388.259, 388.501, 388.503, 388.513, 388.750,
388A.247, 388A.249, 391.033, 391.035, 391.0365, 391.120,
391.925, 392.029, 392.147, 392.264, 392.271, 392.315, 392.317,
392.325, 392.327, 392.335, 392.850, 393.045, 394.167, 394.16975,
394.1698, 394.447, 394.460, 394.465, 396.1415, 396.1425, 396.143,
396.159, 396.3295, 396.405, 396.525, 396.535, 396.9685,
398A.115, 408.3885, 408.3886, 408.3888, 408.5484, 412.153,
414.280, 416.070, 422.2749, 422.305, 422A.342, 422A.350,
425.400, 427A.1236, 427A.872, 427A.940, 432.028, 432.205,
432B.175, 432B.280, 432B.290, 432B.4018, 432B.407, 432B.430,
432B.560, 432B.5902, 432C.140, 432C.150, 433.534, 433A.360,
439.4941, 439.4988, 439.5282, 439.840, 439.914, 439A.116,
439A.124, 439B.420, 439B.754, 439B.760, 439B.845, 440.170,
441A.195, 441A.220, 441A.230, 442.330, 442.395, 442.735,
442.774, 445A.665, 445B.570, 445B.7773, 449.209, 449.245,
449.4315, 449A.112, 450.140, 450B.188, 450B.805, 453.164,
453.720, 458.055, 458.280, 459.050, 459.3866, 459.555, 459.7056,
459.846, 463.120, 463.15993, 463.240, 463.3403, 463.3407,
463.790, 467.1005, 480.535, 480.545, 480.935, 480.940, 481.063,
481.091, 481.093, 482.170, 482.368, 482.5536, 483.340, 483.363,
483.575, 483.659, 483.800, 484A.469, 484B.830, 484B.833,
484E.070, 485.316, 501.344, 503.452, 522.040, 534A.031, 561.285,
571.160, 584.655, 587.877, 598.0964, 598.098, 598A.110,
598A.420, 599B.090, 603.070, 603A.210, 604A.303, 604A.710,
604D.500, 604D.600, 612.265, 616B.012, 616B.015, 616B.315,
-
*SB361*

– 10 –
616B.350, 618.341, 618.425, 622.238, 622.310, 623.131, 623A.137,
624.110, 624.265, 624.327, 625.425, 625A.185, 628.418, 628B.230,
628B.760, 629.043, 629.047, 629.069, 630.133, 630.2671,
630.2672, 630.2673, 630.2687, 630.30665, 630.336, 630A.327,
630A.555, 631.332, 631.368, 632.121, 632.125, 632.3415,
632.3423, 632.405, 633.283, 633.301, 633.427, 633.4715, 633.4716,
633.4717, 633.524, 634.055, 634.1303, 634.214, 634A.169,
634A.185, 634B.730, 635.111, 635.158, 636.262, 636.342, 637.085,
637.145, 637B.192, 637B.288, 638.087, 638.089, 639.183,
639.2485, 639.570, 640.075, 640.152, 640A.185, 640A.220,
640B.405, 640B.730, 640C.580, 640C.600, 640C.620, 640C.745,
640C.760, 640D.135, 640D.190, 640E.225, 640E.340, 641.090,
641.221, 641.2215, 641A.191, 641A.217, 641A.262, 641B.170,
641B.281, 641B.282, 641C.455, 641C.760, 641D.260, 641D.320,
642.524, 643.189, 644A.870, 645.180, 645.625, 645A.050,
645A.082, 645B.060, 645B.092, 645C.220, 645C.225, 645D.130,
645D.135, 645G.510, 645H.320, 645H.330, 647.0945, 647.0947,
648.033, 648.197, 649.065, 649.067, 652.126, 652.228, 653.900,
654.110, 656.105, 657A.510, 661.115, 665.130, 665.133, 669.275,
669.285, 669A.310, 670B.680, 671.365, 671.415, 673.450, 673.480,
675.380, 676A.340, 676A.370, 677.243, 678A.470, 678C.710,
678C.800, 679B.122, 679B.124, 679B.152, 679B.159, 679B.190,
679B.285, 679B.690, 680A.270, 681A.440, 681B.260, 681B.410,
681B.540, 683A.0873, 685A.077, 686A.289, 686B.170, 686C.306,
687A.060, 687A.115, 687B.404, 687C.010, 688C.230, 688C.480,
688C.490, 689A.696, 692A.117, 692C.190, 692C.3507, 692C.3536,
692C.3538, 692C.354, 692C.420, 693A.480, 693A.615, 696B.550,
696C.120, 703.196, 704B.325, 706.1725, 706A.230, 710.159,
711.600, and section 19 of this act, sections 35, 38 and 41 of
chapter 478, Statutes of Nevada 2011 and section 2 of chapter 391,
Statutes of Nevada 2013 and unless otherwise declared by law to be
confidential, all public books and public records of a governmental
entity must be open at all times during office hours to inspection by
any person, and may be fully copied or an abstract or memorandum
may be prepared from those public books and public records. Any
such copies, abstracts or memoranda may be used to supply the
general public with copies, abstracts or memoranda of the records or
may be used in any other way to the advantage of the governmental
entity or of the general public. This section does not supersede or in
any manner affect the federal laws governing copyrights or enlarge,
diminish or affect in any other manner the rights of a person in any
written book or record which is copyrighted pursuant to federal law.
2. A governmental entity may not reject a book or record
which is copyrighted solely because it is copyrighted.
-
*SB361*

– 11 –
3. A governmental entity that has legal custody or control of a
public book or record shall not deny a request made pursuant to
subsection 1 to inspect or copy or receive a copy of a public book or
record on the basis that the requested public book or record contains
information that is confidential if the governmental entity can
redact, delete, conceal or separate, including, without limitation,
electronically, the confidential information from the information
included in the public book or record that is not otherwise
confidential.
4. If requested, a governmental entity shall provide a copy of a
public record in an electronic format by means of an electronic
medium. Nothing in this subsection requires a governmental entity
to provide a copy of a public record in an electronic format or by
means of an electronic medium if:
(a) The public record:
(1) Was not created or prepared in an electronic format; and
(2) Is not available in an electronic format; or
(b) Providing the public record in an electronic format or by
means of an electronic medium would:
(1) Give access to proprietary software; or
(2) Require the production of information that is confidential
and that cannot be redacted, deleted, concealed or separated from
information that is not otherwise confidential.
5. An officer, employee or agent of a governmental entity who
has legal custody or control of a public record:
(a) Shall not refuse to provide a copy of that public record in the
medium that is requested because the officer, employee or agent has
already prepared or would prefer to provide the copy in a different
medium.
(b) Except as otherwise provided in NRS 239.030, shall, upon
request, prepare the copy of the public record and shall not require
the person who has requested the copy to prepare the copy himself
or herself.
H
-
*SB361*